California, session 20252026, AB94.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11382 of the Elections Code is amended to read:11382. There shall not be an election for a successor in a recall of a local officer pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 11200). If a majority of the votes on a recall proposal for a local officer are “Yes”, the officer is removed and the office shall be vacant until it is filled according to law, provided that the officer who was the subject of the recall election shall not be appointed to fill the vacancy in that office.SEC. 2. Section 11385 of the Elections Code is amended to read:11385. If a state officer is recalled at a recall election, the candidate receiving the highest number of votes for the office shall be declared elected for the unexpired term of the recalled officer.